Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.160

Occupant in default—Vehicle, watercraft, trailer, recreational vehicle, or camper removal.

(1) If an occupant is in default for sixty or more days and the personal property stored in the leased space is a vehicle, watercraft, trailer, recreational vehicle, or camper, the owner may have the personal property towed or removed from the self–service storage facility in lieu of a sale. Prior to having the vehicle, watercraft, trailer, recreational vehicle, or camper towed, the owner must provide notice to the occupant stating the name, address, and contact information of the towing company.

(2) The owner is not liable for any damage to the personal property towed or removed from the self–service storage facility once the property is in the possession of a third party.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 6 s 2; 2015 c 13 s 4.]